Maryland, session 2025, HB1435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1435*

HOUSE BILL 1435
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission.
3–207.
(O) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “BIPOC” MEANS BLACK PEOPLE, INDIGENOUS PEOPLE,
AND PEOPLE OF COLOR.
(III) “WHITE SUPREMACIST GROUPS, CAUSES, OR IDEOLOGIES”
MEANS GROUPS, CAUSES, OR IDEOLOGIES THAT:
1. PROMOTE WHITE SUPREMACY AND THE IDEA THAT
WHITE PEOPLE ARE SUPERIOR TO BIPOC;
2. PROMOTE RELIGIOUS AND RACIAL BIGOTRY;
3. SEEK TO EXACERBATE RACIAL AND ETHNIC TENSIONS
BETWEEN BIPOC AND NON–BIPOC; OR
4. ENGAGE IN PATENTLY HATEFUL AND INFLAMMATORY
SPEECH, INTIMIDATION, AND VIOLENCE AGAINST BIPOC AS A MEANS OF
PROMOTING WHITE SUPREMACY.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROHIBIT POLICE OFFICERS FROM:
(I) AFFILIATING WITH, SUPPORTING, OR ADVOCATING FOR
WHITE SUPREMACIST GROUPS, CAUSES, OR IDEOLOGIES; OR
(II) PARTICIPATING IN OR ACTIVELY PROMOTING AN
INTERNATIONAL OR DOMESTIC EXTREMIST GROUP THAT THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION HAS DETERMINED SUPPORTS OR ENCOURAGES ILLEGAL VIOLENT
CONDUCT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.